Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-307
Electric or other lights; free or underpriced service; acceptance by officer; prohibited; penalty.

If any elected or appointed officer in any city or village in this state accepts free of charge or for a price less than is charged other customers for similar services in such city or village electric services from any electric utility company or from any person, partnership, or limited liability company which provides electric service in such city or village, such officer shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and shall also forfeit the office held by him or her at the date of such offense.

Laws 1897, c. 13, § 5, p. 138;

R.S.1913, § 5220;

C.S.1922, § 4421;

C.S.1929, § 18-405;

R.S.1943, § 18-307;

Laws 1982, LB 347, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 138;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 7.